Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Rights and Liabilities

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Proceeds of derivatives of real property held by entirety as themselves held by entirety, 22 ALR4th 459.

Separation agreements: enforceability of provision affecting property rights upon death of one party prior to final judgment of divorce, 67 ALR4th 237.

§ 20-1-201.
Separate estate of real and personal property; not subject to control of spouse; exceptions.

All property belonging to a married person as his separate property which he owns at the time of his marriage or which during marriage he acquires in good faith from any person by descent or otherwise, together with all rents, issues, increase and profits thereof, is during marriage his sole and separate property under his sole control and may be held, owned, possessed and enjoyed by him the same as though he were single. Such property is not subject to the disposal, control or interference of his spouse and is exempt from execution or attachment for the debts of his spouse if the property was not conveyed to him by his spouse in fraud of his creditors. The necessary expenses of the family and the education of the children are chargeable upon the property of both husband and wife, or either of them, for which they may be sued jointly or separately.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 82, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1558; R.S. 1899, § 2972; C.S. 1910, § 3908; Laws 1915, ch. 15, § 1; 1917, ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4974; R.S. 1931, § 69-101; C.S. 1945, § 50-201; W.S. 1957, § 20-22; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-201

.

Person's separate estate includes business, trade and earnings.

Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Disability insurance policy. —

Even assuming that the husband properly characterized the benefits from the disability insurance policy as separate property, they were subject to division by the trial court in the same manner as the parties' jointly owned property where that portion of the disability payments from the insurance policy received by the husband prior to the divorce substituted for income he would have otherwise earned and thus was the product of the marital union. Metz v. Metz, 2003 WY 3, 61 P.3d 383,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2003).

Right of control and disposition of woman's estate,

in her lifetime, by her is absolute, except in case of a homestead, and her right to dispose of her estate by will is also absolute, except that under §

2-4-101

the husband has option to take one-half of the estate, in spite of her will. In re Smith's Estate, 55 Wyo. 181, 97 P.2d 677,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1940).

Right to sue husband. —

Wife as invited guest in husband's automobile may not sue husband for injuries resulting from alleged gross negligence, at least not in absence of liability insurance taken out by husband for his protection. McKinney v. McKinney, 59 Wyo. 204, 135 P.2d 940,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1943).

Separately owned property. —

A married person's separately owned property is subject to distribution by the court, as well as jointly owned property. Mann v. Mann, 979 P.2d 497,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1999).

While a former husband claimed that gifts from his father were his separate property under this section, such a claim did not affect the district court's discretion to make a 50/50 disposition of the parties'
property under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-114

in a divorce action.
McMurry v. McMurry, 2010 WY 163, 245 P.3d 316,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2010).

In granting divorce, court may dispose of wife's separate property.

Lovejoy v. Lovejoy, 36 Wyo. 379, 256 P. 76,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1927), reh'g denied, 38 Wyo. 358, 267 P. 91,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1928).

Liability for necessary expenses of family. —

Account stated for necessary expenses of family as between husband and creditor is not binding on wife, or at least is not conclusive against her, and she is liable only for actual value of necessary expenses incurred. Miracle v. Barker, 59 Wyo. 92, 136 P.2d 678,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1943).

Well-drilling unnecessary expense. —

Drilling of well to irrigate front yard did not constitute a necessary expense of family under the provisions of this section. Rodolph v. Rodolph, 415 P.2d 71,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1966).

Wife's entirety interest in property. —

A wife has an interest in property held by her and her husband by the entirety, consistent with the spirit and letter of art. 6, § 1, Wyo. Const., this section and §

20-1-202

.Ward Terry & Co. v. Hensen, 75 Wyo. 444, 297 P.2d 213,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1956).

Indivisibility, inalienability of entirety estate. —

In the absence of an agreement to the contrary the income, rents and profits of an estate by the entirety are an integral, indivisible part thereof and frequently are the most important part. The estate itself, title and fee thereof, is indivisible between husband and wife and cannot be alienated or in any way disposed of unless they agree to the contrary. That indivisibility must logically extend to every part of the estate including the rents, income and profits thereof and hence neither spouse would alone be able to divest the other thereof voluntarily or involuntarily against the wishes of the other during the life of both. Ward Terry & Co. v. Hensen, 75 Wyo. 444, 297 P.2d 213,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1956).

Ranching operation. —

Court did not err in ordering a piece of a ranching estate to the wife, even though it was given to the parties by the father's grandmother and the husband used it for his ranching operations, where the evidence clearly showed the grandmother gifted the property to the parties and the wife said that she intended to pass the property on to the parties' sons. Odegard v. Odegard, 2003 WY 67, 69 P.3d 917,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2003).

Exclusive right of husband to rents, profits, usufruct, swept away. —

The exclusive right to rents, profits and usufruct of an estate by the entirety on the part of the husband alone has been swept away by former §§ 50-201 through 50-205, W.C.S. 1945 (this section and §

20-1-202

). Ward Terry & Co. v. Hensen, 75 Wyo. 444, 297 P.2d 213,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1956).

And rents and profits cannot be mortgaged by 1 spouse. —

The rents, income and profits of property held by husband and wife by the entirety cannot be subjected to note and mortgage where wife by virtue of her minority disaffirms the note and mortgage. Ward Terry & Co. v. Hensen, 75 Wyo. 444, 297 P.2d 213,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1956).

Applied

in

Kane v. Kane, 706 P.2d 676,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 629

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

West v. Wyoming State Treas., 822 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Conflict of Interest — Legal Interests vs. Relational Interests. Coyne v. State ex rel. Thomas, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979),” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 349 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right and incidence where real property purchased with wife's funds is placed in spouses' joint names, 43 ALR2d 917.

Marriage as extinguishing contractual indebtedness between parties, 45 ALR2d 722.

Spouse's acceptance or retention of benefits of other spouse's fraudulent act as ratification of transaction, 82 ALR3d 625.

Modern status of rule that husband is primarily or solely liable for necessaries furnished wife, 20 ALR4th 196.

Liability of community property for antenuptial debts and obligations, 68 ALR4th 877.

Failure to disclose extent or value of property owned as ground for avoiding premarital contract, 3 ALR5th 394.

§ 20-1-202.
Rights and limitations of married persons incident to the marriage relationship.

Any married person may transfer his separate property in the same manner and to the same extent as if he were unmarried and he may make contracts and incur obligations and liabilities, all of which may be enforced against him to the same extent and in the same manner as if he were unmarried.

Any person may, while married, sue and be sued in all matters having relation to his property, person or reputation, in the same manner as if he were single.

When a married person sues or is sued alone, proceedings shall be had and judgment rendered and enforced as if he were unmarried. His separate property and estate is liable for any judgment against him but he is entitled to the benefit of all exemptions for heads of families.

When any person against whom liabilities exist marries and has or acquires lands, judgment on the liability may be rendered against her, to be levied on the lands only.

A person is not liable for the debts and liabilities of his spouse contracted before marriage without an assumption thereof in writing.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 82, §§ 3, 6, 7; Laws 1882, ch. 68, § 3; 1886, ch. 60, § 326; R.S. 1887, §§ 59, 1560, 1563, 1564, 2666; R.S. 1899, §§ 2973, 2974, 2977, 2978, 3760; C.S. 1910, §§ 3909, 3910, 3913, 3914, 4615; C.S. 1920, §§ 4975, 4976, 4979, 4980, 5886; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 78; R.S. 1931, §§ 69-102, 69-103, 69-105, 69-107, 89-2212; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-3510, 50-202, 50-203, 50-206, 50-207; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-23 to 20-25, 20-27, 20-29; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-202

.

Cross references. —

As to abolition of actions for alienation of affections, criminal conversation, seduction and breach of promise to marry, and for provision that any contract or instrument based on any such right of action shall be void, see §§

1-23-101

through

1-23-105

.

As to release or conveyance of wife's interest in husband's real estate generally, see §

34-1-109

.

As to husband or wife appointing the other attorney in fact to dispose of any interest in real estate, see §

34-1-129

.

As to disposal or encumbrance of homestead being absolutely void unless wife voluntarily joins in conveyance or encumbrance, see §

34-2-121

.

As to rule of civil procedure as to capacity of married woman to sue and be sued, see Rule 17, W.R.C.P.

Person's separate estate includes business, trade and earnings.

See Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Contract between husband and wife to settle marital property rights. —

Husband and wife may, in contemplation of separation or divorce, by valid agreement between themselves, settle and adjust all property rights growing out of the marital relation. Rhinehart v. Rhinehart, 52 Wyo. 363, 75 P.2d 390,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(1938).

Right of wife to sue husband. —

Wife as guest in husband's automobile may not sue husband for injury resulting from alleged gross negligence, at least not in absence of liability insurance taken out by husband for his protection. McKinney v. McKinney, 59 Wyo. 204, 135 P.2d 940,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1943).

Liability of husband when property owned by wife. —

Husband was not liable for automobile tort committed by wife in use of her separate estate and property where no question of agency, ratification, participation or consent of husband was involved. Christensen v. McCann, 41 Wyo. 101, 282 P. 1061,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1929).

Tort damages for impairment of capacity to perform duties. —

A married woman is entitled to recover damages against a tort-feasor for any impairment of her capacity to perform ordinary duties of the home or for loss of ability to perform the duties she customarily performs upon the farm or in the interest of her husband's farming business. Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1956).

Married woman entitled to homestead exemption. —

A married woman, against whom personal judgment was rendered, though judgment was also against her husband, was entitled to homestead exemption in her separate property, on which she lived with her husband, though she was not head of family. Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1919).

Finding of trial court as to right of exemption conclusive. —

Finding of trial court as to right of exemption, when made on conflicting evidence relative to judgment debtor's being about to remove from state, is conclusive. Wakefield v. Lord, 38 Wyo. 301, 266 P. 1066,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1928).

Applied

in

Kane v. Kane, 706 P.2d 676,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 629

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Mann v. Mann, 979 P.2d 497,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Interspousal Disability Doctrine,” 17 Wyo. L.J. 267 (1963).

For case note, “Conflict of Interest — Legal Interests vs. Relational Interests. Coyne v. State ex rel. Thomas, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979),” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 349 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Separation agreement as affecting right to curtesy, 34 ALR2d 1020, 34 ALR2d 1039.

Right of wife to recover in individual capacity for medical expenses of husband injured by third person's negligence, 42 ALR2d 843.

Authority of wife to borrow money on husband's credit, 55 ALR2d 1215.

Wife as head of family within homestead or other property exemption provision, 67 ALR2d 779.

Husband's liability for funeral expenses of wife, 82 ALR2d 873.

Conflict of laws as to right of action between husband and wife or parent and child, 96 ALR2d 973.

What law governs the right of a tortiously injured married woman to sue in her own name and the ownership of the cause of action, 97 ALR2d 725.

Spouse's or parent's right to recover punitive damages in connection with recovery of damages for medical expenses or loss of services or consortium arising from personal injury to other spouse or to child, 25 ALR3d 1416.

Conflict of laws as to right of action for loss of consortium, 46 ALR3d 880.

Right of married woman to use maiden surname, 67 ALR3d 1266.

Modern status of interspousal tort immunity in personal injury and wrongful death actions, 92 ALR3d 901.

Recovery for loss of consortium for injury occurring prior to marriage, 5 ALR4th 300.

Necessity of physical injury to support cause of action for loss of consortium, 16 ALR4th 537.

Modern status of rule that husband is primarily or solely liable for necessaries furnished wife, 20 ALR4th 196.

Spouse's liability, after divorce, for community debt contracted by other spouse during marriage, 20 ALR4th 211.

Spouse's dissipation of marital assets prior to divorce as factor in divorce court's determination of property division, 41 ALR4th 416.